Utah statutes.
63G-8-202.   Action under Governmental Immunity Act of Utah permitted.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude legal action against a public entity for any injury occurring as a result of the decisions or actions taken by a person performing services on a voluntary basis for that entity, where such action would otherwise be permitted under Title 63G, Chapter 7, Governmental Immunity Act of Utah.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

